ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 508 Y 24
SFX 508 0 a .
SFX 508 0 ach .
SFX 508 0 am .
SFX 508 0 ami .
SFX 508 0 mej .
SFX 508 0 my .
SFX 508 0 o .
SFX 508 0 oju .
SFX 508 0 om .
SFX 508 0 oma .
SFX 508 0 ow .
SFX 508 0 owu .
SFX 508 0 tej .
SFX 508 0 u .
SFX 508 0 y .
SFX 508 0 yjo .
SFX 508 0 yjom .
SFX 508 0 yjomej .
SFX 508 0 yjomy .
SFX 508 0 yjotej .
SFX 508 0 yjośo .
SFX 508 0 yjoš .
SFX 508 0 yju .
SFX 508 0 ćo .
SFX 509 Y 23
SFX 509 0 a .
SFX 509 0 ach .
SFX 509 0 am .
SFX 509 0 ami .
SFX 509 0 e .
SFX 509 0 mej .
SFX 509 0 my .
SFX 509 0 oju .
SFX 509 0 om .
SFX 509 0 oma .
SFX 509 0 ow .
SFX 509 0 owu .
SFX 509 0 tej .
SFX 509 0 u .
SFX 509 0 yjo .
SFX 509 0 yjom .
SFX 509 0 yjomej .
SFX 509 0 yjomy .
SFX 509 0 yjotej .
SFX 509 0 yjośo .
SFX 509 0 yjoš .
SFX 509 0 yju .
SFX 509 0 ćo .
SFX 510 Y 30
SFX 510 0 a .
SFX 510 0 ach .
SFX 510 0 achmej .
SFX 510 0 achmy .
SFX 510 0 achu .
SFX 510 0 am .
SFX 510 0 ami .
SFX 510 0 ašo .
SFX 510 0 aštej .
SFX 510 0 ašćo .
SFX 510 0 e .
SFX 510 0 ech .
SFX 510 0 echmej .
SFX 510 0 echmy .
SFX 510 0 echu .
SFX 510 0 ešo .
SFX 510 0 eštej .
SFX 510 0 ešćo .
SFX 510 0 o .
SFX 510 0 oju .
SFX 510 0 om .
SFX 510 0 oma .
SFX 510 0 omej .
SFX 510 0 omy .
SFX 510 0 otej .
SFX 510 0 ow .
SFX 510 0 owu .
SFX 510 0 ośo .
SFX 510 0 oš .
SFX 510 0 u .
SFX 511 Y 30
SFX 511 0 a .
SFX 511 0 ach .
SFX 511 0 achmej .
SFX 511 0 achmy .
SFX 511 0 achu .
SFX 511 0 ašo .
SFX 511 0 aštej .
SFX 511 0 ašćo .
SFX 511 0 e .
SFX 511 0 ego .
SFX 511 0 ej .
SFX 511 0 eje .
SFX 511 0 eju .
SFX 511 0 em .
SFX 511 0 emu .
SFX 511 0 mej .
SFX 511 0 my .
SFX 511 0 tej .
SFX 511 0 u .
SFX 511 0 y .
SFX 511 0 ych .
SFX 511 0 ym .
SFX 511 0 yma .
SFX 511 0 ymej .
SFX 511 0 ymi .
SFX 511 0 ymy .
SFX 511 0 ytej .
SFX 511 0 yśo .
SFX 511 0 yš .
SFX 511 0 ćo .
SFX 512 Y 24
SFX 512 0 a .
SFX 512 0 e .
SFX 512 0 ego .
SFX 512 0 ej .
SFX 512 0 eje .
SFX 512 0 eju .
SFX 512 0 em .
SFX 512 0 emu .
SFX 512 0 i .
SFX 512 0 im .
SFX 512 0 u .
SFX 512 0 y .
SFX 512 0 ych .
SFX 512 0 yjo .
SFX 512 0 yjom .
SFX 512 0 yjomej .
SFX 512 0 yjomy .
SFX 512 0 yjotej .
SFX 512 0 yjośo .
SFX 512 0 yjoš .
SFX 512 0 yju .
SFX 512 0 ym .
SFX 512 0 yma .
SFX 512 0 ymi .
SFX 513 Y 19
SFX 513 0 a .
SFX 513 0 ach .
SFX 513 0 am .
SFX 513 0 ami .
SFX 513 0 e .
SFX 513 0 ego .
SFX 513 0 ej .
SFX 513 0 eju .
SFX 513 0 em .
SFX 513 0 emu .
SFX 513 0 i .
SFX 513 0 ich .
SFX 513 0 im .
SFX 513 0 ima .
SFX 513 0 imi .
SFX 513 0 oma .
SFX 513 0 ow .
SFX 513 0 owu .
SFX 513 0 u .
SFX 514 Y 23
SFX 514 0 a .
SFX 514 0 ach .
SFX 514 0 am .
SFX 514 0 ami .
SFX 514 0 mej .
SFX 514 0 my .
SFX 514 0 oju .
SFX 514 0 om .
SFX 514 0 oma .
SFX 514 0 ow .
SFX 514 0 owu .
SFX 514 0 tej .
SFX 514 0 u .
SFX 514 0 y .
SFX 514 0 yjo .
SFX 514 0 yjom .
SFX 514 0 yjomej .
SFX 514 0 yjomy .
SFX 514 0 yjotej .
SFX 514 0 yjośo .
SFX 514 0 yjoš .
SFX 514 0 yju .
SFX 514 0 śo .
