ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.dic
Lěwick/1,513
dlejš/511
dowóz/509
górc/511
góruc/511
górš/511
kus/509
lěpš/511
nakus/509
nalěś/1,513
njelěpš/511
njepórědnjejš/511
njewudan/1,512
póduš/509
pógórš/509
pónjeźel/1,513
pónos/509
pórědnjejš/511
pósuš/509
pówab/514
pśewóz/509
pśigłos/509
pśiwis/509
pśiwóz/509
rozgłos/509
rozkaz/509
skop/514
spław/514
woblic/508
wokóš/509
wudan/1,512
wukaz/509
wukóńc/509
wuraz/509
wuwóz/509
wótkus/509
wótwóz/509
wóznam/514
zakluc/509
zaraz/509
zawóz/509
znos/509
zwiw/514
złom/514
śěš/511
škórc/509
ženj/1,510
